Maryland, session 2026, SB0501.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
9–323.
(H) THE GOVERNING BODY OF WASHINGTON COUNTY AND OF A MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION IN WASHINGTON COUNTY SHALL GRANT, BY LAW, A PROPERTY TAX
CREDIT EQUAL TO 100% OF THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPAL CORPORATION PROPERTY
TAX IMPOSED ON REAL PROPERTY THAT IS:
(1) OWNED BY PLATOON 22, INCORPORATED; AND
(2) USED TO PROVIDE HOUSING TO VETERANS.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 1 –